Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
622

DOCUMENTARY
EVIDENCE

Part I. General Provisions--Repealed

Section

622-1 to 5 Repealed

Part II. Documentary Evidence of a Public
Nature;

Corporate Records--Repealed

622-11 to 23 Repealed

Part III. Federal Statutes Concerning
Missing Persons;

Effect of--Repealed

622-31 to 33 Repealed

Part IV. Probate, Pedigree, Title

622-41, 42 Repealed

622-43 Decree of distribution, prima facie
evidence of what

622-44, 45 Repealed

Part V. Medical Records

622-51 Definitions

622-52 Subpoena duces tecum for medical records,

compliance

622-53 Affidavit accompanying medical records

622-54, 55 Repealed

622-56 Fees; service of more than one subpoena

622-57 Availability of medical records

622-58 Retention of medical records

622-59 Health care data discovery

Note

As to procedural statutes superseded by the rules of court,
see note preceding Title 32.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next